Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 7 Ignition Interlock Devices

Administrative rules and regulations.

Ignition Interlock Devices, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Driver Services, Driver License Services, Chapter 375-3-6.

Law reviews.

For note on 1993 enactment of this article, see 10 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 169 (1993).

For note on 2000 amendments of O.C.G.A. §§

42-8-110

to

42-8-118

, see 17 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 253 (2000).

42-8-110.
Definitions; applicability; purchase or lease of ignition interlock devices by counties, municipalities, or private entities; costs, fees, and deposits; participation by indigents.

As used in this article, the term “ignition interlock device” means a constant monitoring device certified by the commissioner of driver services which prevents a motor vehicle from being started at any time without first determining the equivalent blood alcohol concentration of the operator through the taking of a deep lung breath sample. The system shall be calibrated so that the motor vehicle may not be started if the blood alcohol concentration of the operator, as measured by the device, exceeds 0.02 grams or if the sample is not a sample of human breath.

As used in this article, the term “provider center” means a facility established for the purpose of providing and installing ignition interlock devices when their use is required by or as a result of an order of a court or as required in order to maintain an ignition interlock device limited driving permit in accordance with Code Section 40-5-64.1.

Ignition interlock devices for provider centers may be purchased or leased by counties, municipalities, or private entities.

A provider center shall be authorized to charge the person whose vehicle is to be equipped with an ignition interlock device such installation, deinstallation, and user fees as are approved by the Department of Driver Services. A provider center may also require such person to make a security deposit for the safe return of the ignition interlock device. Payment of any or all of such fees and deposits may be made a condition of probation under this order.

If a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state purchases or leases ignition interlock devices from a private entity, such county or municipality shall allow persons who are found by the court to be indigent and unable to pay the fees or deposits for such an ignition interlock device to participate in the ignition interlock program.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-110

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 568, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 760, § 26; Ga. L. 1999, p. 391, § 11; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1457, § 6; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 42; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 24-3/HB 501; Ga. L. 2016, p. 323, § 1-5/HB 205.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added “or as required in order to maintain an ignition interlock device limited driving permit in accordance with Code Section 40-5-64.1” at the end of subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 760, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Teen-age and Adult Driver Responsibility Act’.”

Ga. L. 1999, p. 391, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “it is fitting to honor the memory of all victims of drunken driving and Heidi Marie Flye, Cathryn Nicole Flye, and Audrey Marie Flye in particular by strengthening the laws requiring the installation and use of ignition interlock devices.”

Ga. L. 1999, p. 391, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘Heidi’s Law.’ ”

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 203 (1997).

For note on 1999 amendment to this Code section, see 16 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 200 (1999).

42-8-110.1.
Ignition interlock device limited driving permit; restrictions.

Any person issued an ignition interlock device limited driving permit under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 40-5-64.1 shall, upon issuance thereof and within no less than ten days of such issuance, have installed and shall maintain in any motor vehicle to be driven by such person for a period of not less than four months a functioning, certified ignition interlock device, and such person shall not drive any motor vehicle whatsoever that is not so equipped during such period.

Any person issued an ignition interlock device limited driving permit under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 40-5-64.1 shall, upon issuance thereof and within no less than ten days of such issuance, have installed and shall maintain in any motor vehicle to be driven by such person for a period of not less than 12 months a functioning, certified ignition interlock device, and such person shall not drive any motor vehicle whatsoever that is not so equipped during such period.

The restriction for maintaining and using an ignition interlock device shall be cancelled by the department upon payment to the department of a $100.00 fee or $90.00 when such fee is processed by mail and upon successful completion of the term of monitoring on an ignition interlock device required under subsection (a) of this Code section.

Any ignition interlock device limited driving permit issued shall bear a restriction reflecting that the person shall only operate a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device.

The fee for issuance of an ignition interlock device limited driving permit shall be as prescribed in Code Section 40-5-64.1.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-110.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 323, § 1-6/HB 205.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2017.

42-8-111.
Court issuance of certificate for installation of ignition interlock devices; exceptions; completion of alcohol and drug use risk reduction program; notice of requirements; fees for driver’s license.

Upon a second or subsequent conviction of a resident of this state for violating Code Section 40-6-391 within five years, as measured from the dates of previous arrests for which convictions were obtained to the date of the current arrest for which a conviction is obtained, for which such person is granted probation, the court shall issue a certificate of eligibility for an ignition interlock device limited driving permit or probationary license, subject to the following conditions:

Such person shall have installed and shall maintain in each motor vehicle registered in such person’s name for a period of not less than one year a functioning, certified ignition interlock device;

Such person shall have installed and shall maintain in any other motor vehicle to be driven by such person for a period of not less than one year a functioning, certified ignition interlock device, and such person shall not drive any motor vehicle whatsoever that is not so equipped during such period. Upon successful completion of one year of monitoring of such ignition interlock device, the restriction for maintaining and using such ignition interlock device shall be removed, and the permit may be renewed for additional periods of two months as provided in paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of Code Section 40-5-64.1; and

Such person shall participate in a substance abuse treatment program as defined in paragraph (16.2) of Code Section 40-5-1, a drug court division in compliance with Code Section 15-1-15, a mental health court division in compliance with Code Section 15-1-16, a veterans court division in compliance with Code Section 15-1-17, or an operating under the influence court division in compliance with Code Section 15-1-19 for a period of not less than 120 days.

For the purposes of this subsection, a plea of nolo contendere shall constitute a conviction; and a conviction of any offense under the laws of any other state or territory of the United States which, if committed in this state, would be a violation of Code Section 40-6-391 shall be deemed a conviction of violating such Code section.

The court may, in its discretion, decline to issue a certificate of eligibility for an ignition interlock device limited driving permit or probationary license for any reason or exempt a person from any or all ignition interlock device requirements upon a determination that such requirements would subject such person to undue financial hardship. Notwithstanding any contrary provision of Code Section 40-13-32 or 40-13-33, a determination of financial hardship may be made at the time of conviction or any time thereafter. If a court grants an exemption from the ignition interlock device requirements, such person shall not be eligible for a limited driving permit or any other driving privilege for a period of one year.

In the case of any person subject to the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section, the court shall include in the record of conviction or violation submitted to the Department of Driver Services a copy of the certificate of eligibility for an ignition interlock device limited driving permit or probationary license issued by the court or documentation of the court’s decision to decline to issue such certificate. Such certificate shall specify any exemption from the installation requirements of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section and any vehicles subject to the installation requirements of paragraph (2) of such subsection. The records of the Department of Driver Services shall contain a record reflecting such certificate, and the person’s driver’s license, limited driving permit, or probationary license shall contain a notation that the person may only operate a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device.

Except as provided in Code Sections 42-8-110.1 and 42-8-112, no provision of this article shall be deemed to reduce any period of driver’s license suspension or revocation otherwise imposed by law.

The fee for issuance of any driver’s license indicating that use of an ignition interlock device is required shall be as prescribed for a regular driver’s license in Code Section 40-5-25, and the fee for issuance of any limited driving permit indicating that use of an ignition interlock device is required shall be as prescribed in Code Section 40-5-64.1; except that, for habitual violators required to use an ignition interlock device as a condition of a probationary license, the fee shall be as prescribed for a probationary license in Code Section 40-5-58.

Exemptions granted due to financial hardship pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be exempt from the subject matter jurisdiction limitations imposed in Code Sections 40-13-32 and 40-13-33.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-111

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 568, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 391, § 12; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1457, § 6; Ga. L. 2001, p. 208, § 1-8; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 42; Ga. L. 2003, p. 140, § 42; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 24-4/HB 501; Ga. L. 2011, p. 355, § 19/HB 269; Ga. L. 2012, p. 72, § 6/SB 236; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 42/HB 942; Ga. L. 2013, p. 878, § 3/HB 407; Ga. L. 2016, p. 323, § 1-7/HB 205; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 8-7/SB 367; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 42/SB 365.

The 2012 amendments.

The first 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, rewrote subsections (a) through (c), which read: “(a) In addition to any other provision of probation, upon a second or subsequent conviction of a resident of this state for violating Code Section 40-6-391 within five years, as measured from the dates of previous arrests for which convictions were obtained to the date of the current arrest for which a conviction is obtained, for which such person is granted probation, the court shall order as conditions of probation that:

“(1) Such person shall have installed and shall maintain in each motor vehicle registered in such person’s name throughout the applicable six-month period prescribed by subsection (b) of Code Section 42-8-112 a functioning, certified ignition interlock device, unless the court exempts the person from the requirements of this paragraph based upon the court’s determination that such requirements would subject the person to undue financial hardship; and

“(2) Such person shall have installed and shall maintain in any other motor vehicle to be driven by such person during the applicable six-month period prescribed by subsection (b) of Code Section 42-8-112 a functioning, certified ignition interlock device, and such person shall not during such six-month period drive any motor vehicle whatsoever that is not so equipped.

“For the purposes of this subsection, a plea of nolo contendere shall constitute a conviction; and a conviction of any offense under the law of another state or territory substantially conforming to any offense under Code Section 40-6-391 shall be deemed a conviction of violating said Code section.

“(b) Any resident of this state who is ordered to use an ignition interlock device, as a condition of probation, shall complete the DUI Alcohol or Drug Use Risk Reduction Program and submit to the court or probation department a certificate of completion of the DUI Alcohol or Drug Use Risk Reduction Program and certification of installation of a certified ignition interlock device to the extent required by subsection (a) of this Code section.

“(c) In the case of any person subject to the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section, the court shall include in the record of conviction or violation submitted to the Department of Driver Services notice of the requirement for, and the period of the requirement for, the use of a certified ignition interlock device. Such notice shall specify any exemption from the installation requirements of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section and any vehicles subject to the installation requirements of paragraph (2) of said subsection. The records of the Department of Driver Services shall contain a record reflecting mandatory use of such device and the person’s driver’s license or limited driving permit shall contain a notation that the person may only operate a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device.” The second 2012 amendment, effective May 1, 2012, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in subsection (f).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “one year” for “eight months” in paragraph (a)(1) and twice in paragraph (a)(2); substituted “two months” for “six months” in the last sentence of paragraph (a)(2); and added the third sentence in subsection (b). See editor’s note for applicability.

The 2016 amendments.

The first 2016 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in subsection (a), substituted “provided in subsection (d) of Code Section 40-5-64.1” for “provided in paragraph (1) of subsection (e) of Code Section 40-6-64” in the last sentence of paragraph (a)(2); substituted “Code Section 40-5-1, a drug court division in compliance with Code Section 15-1-15, a mental health court division in compliance with Code Section 15-1-16, or a veterans court division in compliance with Code Section 15-1-17” for “Code Section 40-5-1 or a drug court program” in paragraph (a)(3); and substituted the present provisions of the ending paragraph of subsection (a) for the former provisions, which read: “For the purposes of this subsection, a plea of nolo contendere shall constitute a conviction; and a conviction of any offense under the law of another state or territory substantially conforming to any offense under Code Section 40-6-391 shall be deemed a conviction of violating said Code section.”; substituted “Code Sections 42-8-110.1 and 42-8-112” for “Code Section 42-8-112” in subsection (d); and substituted “prescribed in Code Section 40-5-64.1” for “prescribed for a limited driving permit in Code Section 40-5-64” in subsection (e). The second 2016 amendment, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “, a drug court division in compliance with Code Section 15-1-15, a mental health court division in compliance with Code Section 15-1-16, a veterans court division in compliance with Code Section 15-1-17, or an operating under the influence court division in compliance with Code Section 15-1-19” for “or a drug court program in compliance with Code Section 15-1-15”.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “in paragraph (2) of subsection (d)” for “in subsection (d)” in the last sentence of paragraph (a)(2).

Cross references.

Periods of suspension; conditions to return of license, §

40-5-63

.

Limited driving permits for certain offenders, §

40-5-64

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2016, the “or” preceding “a veterans court division” in the middle of paragraph (a)(3) as enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 323, § 1-7/HB 205, effective July 1, 2017, was not given effect.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1999, p. 391, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “it is fitting to honor the memory of all victims of drunken driving and Heidi Marie Flye, Cathryn Nicole Flye, and Audrey Marie Flye in particular by strengthening the laws requiring the installation and use of ignition interlock devices.”

Ga. L. 1999, p. 391, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘Heidi’s Law.’ ”

Ga. L. 2013, p. 878, § 5/HB 407, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2013, and shall apply to offenses committed on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For note on 1999 amendment to this Code section, see 16 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 200 (1999).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-8-112.
Timing for issuance of ignition interlock device limited driving permit; documentation required; reporting requirement.

In any case where the court grants a certificate of eligibility for an ignition interlock device limited driving permit or probationary license pursuant to Code Section 42-8-111 to a person whose driver’s license is suspended pursuant to subparagraph (c)(2)(C) of Code Section 40-5-57.1 or paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 40-5-63, the Department of Driver Services shall not issue an ignition interlock device limited driving permit until after the expiration of 120 days from the date of the conviction for which such certificate was granted.

The Department of Driver Services shall condition issuance of an ignition interlock device limited driving permit for such person upon receipt of acceptable documentation of the following:

That the person to whom such permit is to be issued has completed a DUI Alcohol or Drug Use Risk Reduction Program certified by the Department of Driver Services;

That such person has completed a clinical evaluation as defined in Code Section 40-5-1 and enrolled in a substance abuse treatment program approved by the Department of Human Services or is enrolled in a drug court program;

That such person has installed an ignition interlock device in any vehicle that he or she will be operating; and

A certificate of eligibility for an ignition interlock device limited driving permit or probationary license from the court that sentenced such person for the conviction that resulted in the suspension or revocation of his or her driver’s license for which he or she is applying for a limited driving permit or probationary license.

In any case where the court grants a certificate of eligibility for an ignition interlock device limited driving permit or probationary license pursuant to Code Section 42-8-111 to a person whose driver’s license is revoked as a habitual violator pursuant to Code Section 40-5-58, the Department of Driver Services shall not issue a habitual violator probationary license until after the expiration of two years from the date of the conviction for which such certificate was granted.

The Department of Driver Services shall condition issuance of a habitual violator probationary license for such person upon receipt of acceptable documentation of the following:

That the person to whom such probationary license is to be issued has completed a DUI Alcohol or Drug Use Risk Reduction Program certified by the Department of Driver Services;

That such person has completed a clinical evaluation as defined in Code Section 40-5-1 and enrolled in a substance abuse treatment program approved by the Department of Human Services or is enrolled in a drug court program;

That such person has installed an ignition interlock device in any vehicle that he or she will be operating; and

A certificate of eligibility for an ignition interlock device limited driving permit or probationary license from the court that sentenced such person for the conviction that resulted in the suspension or revocation of his or her driver’s license for which he or she is applying for a limited driving permit or probationary license.

In any case where installation of an ignition interlock device is required, failure to show proof of such device shall be grounds for refusal of reinstatement of such license or issuance of such habitual violator’s probationary license or the immediate suspension or revocation of such license.

Any limited driving permit or probationary license issued to such person shall bear a restriction reflecting that the person may only operate a motor vehicle equipped with a functional ignition interlock device. No person whose limited driving permit or probationary license contains such restriction shall operate a motor vehicle that is not equipped with a functional ignition interlock device.

Any person who has been issued an ignition interlock device limited driving permit or a habitual violator probationary license bearing an ignition interlock device condition shall maintain such ignition interlock device in any motor vehicle he or she operates to the extent required by the certificate of eligibility for such permit or probationary license issued to such person by the court in which he or she was convicted for not less than one year.

Upon the expiration of such one-year ignition interlock device limited driving permit or habitual violator probationary license, the driver may, if otherwise qualified, apply for renewal of such permit or probationary license without such ignition interlock device restriction.

Each resident of this state who is required to have an ignition interlock device installed pursuant to this article shall report to the provider center every 30 days for the purpose of monitoring the operation of each required ignition interlock device. If at any time it is determined that a person has tampered with the device, the Department of Driver Services shall be given written notice within five days by the community supervision officer, the court ordering the use of such device, or the interlock provider. If an ignition interlock device is found to be malfunctioning, it shall be replaced or repaired, as ordered by the court or the Department of Driver Services, at the expense of the provider.

An ignition interlock provider shall notify the Department of Driver Services if a person required by subsection (c) of this Code section fails to report to the provider as required, receives an unsatisfactory report from the provider, or requests the provider remove the ignition interlock device at any time during the ignition interlock device limited driving permit period, and the Department of Driver Services shall revoke such person’s permit immediately upon receipt of such notification. Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, within 30 days after such revocation, the person may make a written request for a hearing and remit to the Department of Driver Services a payment of $250.00 for the cost of the hearing. Within 30 days after receiving a written request for a hearing and a payment of $250.00, the Department of Driver Services shall hold a hearing as provided in Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” The hearing shall be recorded.

Any person whose ignition interlock device limited driving permit was revoked on or before July 1, 2004, for failure to report or failure to receive a satisfactory report may make a written request for a hearing and remit to the Department of Driver Services a payment of $250.00 for the cost of the hearing. Within 30 days after receiving a written request for a hearing and a payment of $250.00, the Department of Driver Services shall hold a hearing as provided in Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” The hearing shall be recorded.

If the hearing officer determines that the person failed to report to the ignition interlock provider for any of the reasons specified in this paragraph, the Department of Driver Services shall issue a new ignition interlock device limited driving permit that shall be valid for a period of one year to such person. Such reasons shall be for providential cause and shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Medical necessity, as evidenced by a written statement from a medical doctor;

The person was incarcerated;

The person was required to be on the job at his or her place of employment, with proof that the person would be terminated if he or she was not at work; or

The vehicle with the installed interlock device was rendered inoperable by reason of collision, fire, or a major mechanical failure.

If the hearing officer determines that the person failed to report to the ignition interlock provider for any reason other than those specified in paragraph (3) of this subsection, or if the person received an unsatisfactory report from the provider, after the expiration of 120 days the person may apply to the Department of Driver Services and the Department of Driver Services shall issue a new ignition interlock device limited driving permit to such person.

This subsection shall not apply to any person convicted of violating Code Section 42-8-118.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-112

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 568, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1457, § 6; Ga. L. 2001, p. 208, § 1-9; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 42; Ga. L. 2003, p. 796, § 8; Ga. L. 2004, p. 604, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 42/HB 95; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 24-5/HB 501; Ga. L. 2012, p. 72, § 7/SB 236; Ga. L. 2013, p. 878, § 4/HB 407; Ga. L. 2014, p. 710, § 1-20/SB 298; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 42/HB 90; Ga. L. 2015, p. 60, § 5-1/SB 100; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-73/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 323, § 1-8/HB 205.

The 2012 amendment,

effective January 1, 2013, substituted the present provisions of subsections (a) and (b) for the former provisions, which read: “(a) In any case where the court imposes the use of an ignition interlock device as a condition of probation on a resident of this state whose driving privilege is not suspended or revoked, the court shall require the person to surrender his or her driver’s license to the court immediately and provide proof of compliance with such order to the court or the probation officer and obtain an ignition interlock device restricted driving license within 30 days. Upon expiration of the period of time for which such person is required to use an ignition interlock device, the person may apply for and receive a regular driver’s license upon payment of the fee provided for in Code Section 40-5-25. If such person fails to provide proof of installation to the extent required by subsection (a) of Code Section 42-8-111 and receipt of the restricted driving license within such period, absent a finding by the court of good cause for that failure, which finding is entered in the court’s record, the court shall revoke or terminate the probation.

“(b)(1) In any case where the court imposes the use of an ignition interlock device as a condition of probation on a resident of this state whose driving privilege is suspended or revoked, the court shall require the person to provide proof of compliance with such order to the court or the probation officer and the Department of Driver Services not later than ten days after the date on which such person first becomes eligible to apply for an ignition interlock device limited driving permit in accordance with paragraph (2) of this subsection or a habitual violator’s probationary license in accordance with paragraph (3) of this subsection, whichever is applicable. If such person fails to provide proof of installation to the extent required by subsection (a) of Code Section 42-8-111 within the period required by this subsection, absent a finding by the court of good cause for that failure, which finding is entered on the court’s record, the court shall revoke or terminate the probation if such is still applicable.

“(2) If the person subject to court ordered use of an ignition interlock device as a condition of probation is authorized under Code Section 40-5-63 or 40-5-67.2 to apply for reinstatement of his or her driver’s license during the period of suspension, such person shall, prior to applying for reinstatement of the license, have an ignition interlock device installed and shall maintain such ignition interlock device in a motor vehicle or vehicles to the extent required by subsection (a) of Code Section 42-8-111 for a period of six months running concurrently with that of an ignition interlock device limited driving permit, which permit shall not be issued until such person submits to the department proof of completion of a DUI Alcohol or Drug Use Risk Reduction Program, proof of having undergone any clinical evaluation and of having enrolled in any substance abuse treatment program required by Code Section 40-5-63.1, and proof of installation of an ignition interlock device on a vehicle or vehicles to the extent required by subsection (a) of Code Section 42-8-111. Such a person may apply for and be issued an ignition interlock device limited driving permit at the end of 12 months after the suspension of the driver’s license. At the expiration of such six-month ignition interlock device limited driving permit, the driver may, if otherwise qualified, apply for reinstatement of a regular driver’s license upon payment of the fee provided in Code Section 40-5-25.

“(3) If the person subject to court ordered use of an ignition interlock device as a condition of probation is authorized under Code Section 40-5-58 or under Code Section 40-5-67.2 to obtain a habitual violator’s probationary license, such person shall, if such person is a habitual violator as a result of two or more convictions for driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs, have an ignition interlock device installed and maintained in a motor vehicle or vehicles to the extent required by subsection (a) of Code Section 42-8-111 for a period of six months following issuance of the probationary license, and such person shall not during such six-month period drive any motor vehicle that is not so equipped, all as conditions of such probationary license. Following expiration of such six-month period with no violation of the conditions of the probationary license, the person may apply for a habitual violator probationary license without such ignition interlock device condition.

“(4) In any case where installation of an ignition interlock device is required, failure to show proof of such device shall be grounds for refusal of reinstatement of such license or issuance of such habitual violator’s probationary license or the immediate suspension or revocation of such license.”

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in subsection (b), inserted “probationary” in the middle of subparagraph (b)(2)(A), substituted “one year” for “eight months” at the end of subparagraph (b)(5)(A), and substituted “one-year” for “eight-month” near the beginning of subparagraph (b)(5)(B); substituted “one-year” for “six-month” in the first sentence of paragraph (d)(1); in the introductory paragraph of paragraph (d)(3), substituted “specified in this paragraph” for “specified below”
in the first sentence, inserted “shall” near the end of the second sentence, and substituted “one year” for “six months”. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added “certified by the Department of Driver Services” at the end of subparagraphs (a)(2)(A) and (b)(2)(A), and substituted “permit” for “probationary license” at the beginning of subparagraph (b)(2)(A).

The 2015 amendments.

The first 2015 amendment, effective March 13, 2015, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “probationary license” for “permit” in subparagraph (b)(2)(A). The second 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, substituted “subparagraph (c)(2)(C)” for “subparagraph (b)(2)(C)” near the middle of paragraph (a)(1). See Editor’s notes for applicability. The third 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, substituted “community supervision” for “probation” in the second sentence of subsection (c); in subsection (d), substituted “Department of Driver Services” for “department” throughout. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted the present provisions of the first sentence of paragraph (d)(1) for the former provisions, which read: “If a person required to report to an ignition interlock provider as required by subsection (c) of this Code section fails to report to the provider as required or receives an unsatisfactory report from the provider at any time during the one-year period, the Department of Driver Services shall revoke such person’s ignition interlock device limited driving permit immediately upon notification from the provider of the failure to report or failure to receive a satisfactory report.”

Cross references.

Clinical evaluation and substance abuse treatment programs for certain offenders, §

40-5-63.1

.

Limited driving permits for certain offenders, §

40-5-64

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 878, § 5/HB 407, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2013, and shall apply to offenses committed on or after such date.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 60, § 6-1/SB 100, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that this Act shall apply to offenses which occur on or after July 1, 2015.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Order 03.25.20.01.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 and 2021 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-113.
Renting, leasing, or lending motor vehicle to probationer subject to this article prohibited.

No person shall knowingly rent, lease, or lend a motor vehicle to a person known to have had his or her driving privilege restricted as provided in this article, unless the vehicle is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device. Any person whose driving privilege is restricted as provided in this article shall notify any other person who rents, leases, or loans a motor vehicle to him or her of such driving restriction.

Any person convicted of a violation of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-113

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 568, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1457, § 6; Ga. L. 2012, p. 72, § 8/SB 236.

The 2012 amendment,

effective January 1, 2013, in subsection (a), twice deleted “as a condition of probation” following “restricted” in the first and second sentences.

42-8-114.
Specifying provider for ignition interlock device.

No judicial officer, community supervision officer, law enforcement officer, or other officer or employee of a court; person who owns, operates, or is employed by a private company which has contracted to provide private probation services for misdemeanor cases; or professional bondsman or agent or employee thereof shall specify, directly or indirectly, a particular provider center which the person may or shall utilize when use of an ignition interlock device is required. This subsection shall not prohibit any judicial officer, community supervision officer, law enforcement officer, or other officer or employee of a court; owner, operator, or employee of a private company which has contracted to provide probation services for misdemeanor cases; or professional bondsman or agent or employee thereof from furnishing any person, upon request, the names of certified provider centers.

No person who owns, operates, or is employed by a private company which has contracted to provide probation services for misdemeanor cases or professional bondsman or agent or employee thereof shall be authorized to own, operate, or be employed by a provider center.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-114

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 568, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1457, § 6; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-76/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “community supervision” for “probation” twice in subsection (a). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-115.
Certification of ignition interlock devices.

The commissioner of driver services or the commissioner’s designee shall certify ignition interlock devices required by this article and the providers of such devices and shall promulgate rules and regulations for the certification of said devices and providers. The standards for certification of such devices shall include, but not be limited to, those standards for such devices promulgated by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration and adopted by rule or regulation of the Department of Driver Services.

The commissioner of driver services may utilize information from an independent agency to certify ignition interlock devices on or off the premises of the manufacturer in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article. The cost of certification shall be borne by the manufacturers of ignition interlock devices.

The commissioner of driver services shall adopt rules and regulations for determining the accuracy of and proper use of the ignition interlock devices in full compliance with this article. No model of ignition interlock device shall be certified unless it meets the accuracy requirements specified by such rules and regulations.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-115

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 568, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1457, § 6; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 42; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 24-6/HB 501.